src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON DAHPPA !!= * __@CODE@__ dahpa, dáhpa and dáhppa. to avoid dáhpahuvvat, dahpahuvvat etc in speller
!                                     +N:%>                                     GOAHTICMP        ;
                               +N+Sg+Nom:                                       K                ;
                                  < "+N":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3V            ;
            +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá                                K                ;
            +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi                                K                ;
                                      +N:%>                                     EssV             ;
                                      +N:%>X2                                   GOAHTA-          ; ! Px sublexicon
                                      +N:%>X3                                   GOAHTAI          ; ! Ill sublexicon
                             +N+Err/Orth:%>                                     GOAHTAI          ; ! Ill sublexicon
                               +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4                                   K                ;
                               +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4                                   K                ;
!                    +N+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:%>X4                                   R                ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
                               +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4                                   NPx3V            ;
                               +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4                                   NPx3V            ;
                               +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4s                                  K                ;
                +N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n                                  K                ; ! !SOUTH
                               +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4st%>                               NPxC             ;
                               +N+Pl+Nom:%>X4t                                  K                ;
                      +N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X4k                                  K                ;
                             +N+Err/Orth:%>X5                                   GODII-           ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
                                      +N:%>%^DISIMP                             GODII-           ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
                                      +N:%>X6                                   GOADA-           ; ! AG Px
                        +N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%>X8                                   K                ; ! Ditto (?)
         +N+Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:»W4heapmi%>                            HEAPMI           ;
     +N+Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX+Ess:»W4heapmi%>X1n                         K                ;
     +N+Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX+Ess:»W4heapmi%>X1n%>                       NPxC             ;
     +N+Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX+Ess:»W4heapmi%>X7n%>                       NPxC             ;
  +N+Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:»W4hin                                 K                ; !
         +N+Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:»W4his%>                               ATTR             ;
         +N+Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:»W4h                                   EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
!   +N+Der1+Der2+Der/huvva+V+IV+Use/-PLX:»W4huvva%>                             BOAHTIINCH       ;
        +N+Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV+Use/-PLX:»W4huhtti%>                            DIEHTIStem       ;
!                                     +N:                                       DenominalAdjsV2  ;
                                      +N:                                       DenominalNounsV  ;

LEXICON LAHKI  !!= * __@CODE@__ the words on -láhki. Because in speller we want to aviod boasttoláhkái, borranláhki etc. (borran láhkai)
                            +N:%>                                     GOAHTICMP       ;
                     +N+Sg+Nom:                                       K               ;
                        < "+N":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3V           ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá                                K               ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi                                K               ;
                            +N:%>                                     EssV            ;
                            +N:%>X2                                   GOAHTA-         ; ! Px sublexicon
                            +N:%>X3                                   GOAHTAI         ; ! Ill sublexicon
!                  +N+Err/Orth:%>                                     GOAHTAI         ; ! Ill sublexicon
                            +N:%>X4                                   GOADI-          ; ! weak grade decl
                   +N+Err/Orth:%>X5                                   GODII-          ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
                            +N:%>%^DISIMP                             GODII-          ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
                            +N:%>X6                                   GOADA-          ; ! AG Px
                            +N:%>X8                                   GOADE-IU-       ; ! Ditto (?)
                            +N:%>                                     DenominalAdjsV1 ;
!                           +N:%>                                     DenominalAdjsV2 ;
                            +N:%>                                     DenominalNounsV ;



LEXICON BEARRI !!= * __@CODE@__  to avoid unfortunate diminutives like bearáš and salaš in speller (bearaš, sálaš)
                            +N:%>                                     GOAHTICMP       ;
                     +N+Sg+Nom:                                       K               ;
                        < "+N":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3V           ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá                                K               ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi                                K               ;
                            +N:%>                                     EssV            ;
                            +N:%>                                     GOAHTI-IU-OBL   ;
                            +N:                                       DenominalAdjsV1 ;
                            +N:                                       DenominalAdjsV2 ;
!                           +N:                                       DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON TAXI !!= * __@CODE@__ dákse and tákse
     +N+Sg+Nom:e         K         ;
     +N+Sg+Ill:i%>j      K         ;
     +N+Sg+Gen:se        K         ;
     +N+Sg+Acc:se        K         ;
     +N+Sg+Loc:se%>s     K         ;
     +N+Pl+Nom:se%>t     K         ;
     +N+Sg+Com:si%>jn    K         ;
     +N+Pl+Gen:si%>jd9   K         ;
     +N+Pl+Acc:si%>jd9   K         ;
     +N+Pl+Ill:si%>jde   K         ;
     +N+Pl+Loc:si%>jn    K         ;
     +N+Pl+Com:si%>jgujn K         ;
        +N+Ess:e%>n      K         ;
     +N+Sg+Nom:e%>       NPx1V     ; !^P^
     +N+Sg+Gen:e%>       NPx1V     ; !^P^
     +N+Sg+Acc:e%>       NPx1V     ; !^P^
     +N+Sg+Nom:e%>       NPx2V     ; !^P^
     +N+Sg+Gen:se%>      NPx2V     ; !^P^
     +N+Sg+Acc:se%>      NPx2V     ; !^P^
     +N+Sg+Ill:e%>s      NPxC      ; !^P^
     +N+Sg+Gen:se%>      NPx3V     ; !^P^
     +N+Sg+Acc:se%>      NPx3V     ; !^P^
     +N+Sg+Loc:se%>st    NPxC      ; !^P^
     +N+Sg+Com:si%>jn    NPxC      ; !^P^
!    +N+Pl+Nom:si%>jd    NPx1C     ; !^P^
     +N+Pl+Gen:si%>jd    NPxC      ; !^P^
     +N+Pl+Acc:si%>jd    NPxC      ; !^P^
     +N+Pl+Ill:si%>jdasa NPxVvowch ; !^P^
     +N+Pl+Loc:si%>jn    NPxC      ; !^P^
     +N+Pl+Com:si%>jd    NPxPlComC ; !^P^
  +N+Cmp/SgNom:e%>       R         ;
  +N+Cmp/SgGen:se%>      R         ; !^NG^  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-


LEXICON ACTOR !!= * __@CODE@__ +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG 
 +N+NomAg+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG: ACTORCT ;
