src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON HyphNouns
Polaris-vuovdi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum+CmpN/First:Polaris-vuovdi¤ ACTOR ;
LEXICON Noun
klássabossu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:klássa#bossu¤ ACTOR  ;
aviisadoalli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:aviisa#doalli¤ ACTOR ;
bargohárjehalli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:bargo#hárjehalli¤ ACTOR ;
bearri:bearri BEARRI ;
beassanláhki:beassan#láh'ki LAHKI ;
beassi:beassi BEARRI ;
biebmovuovdi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:biebmo#vuovdi¤ ACTOR ;
birgenláhki:birgen#láh'ki LAHKI ;
birsevuoddji+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:birse#vuoddji¤ ACTOR ;
boazodoalloláhki:boazo#doallo#láh'ki LAHKI ;
stádabivdi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:stáda#bivdi¤ ACTOR ;
bovdehusdákse+Veh:bovdehus#dáks TAXI ;
bovdehustákse+Veh:bovdehus#táks TAXI ;
bussáealli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani:bussá#ealli¤ ACTOR ;
bádji+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:bád'ji BEARRI ;
bátnedikšu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:bátne#dikšu¤ ACTOR ;
dahkki+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Hum:dahkki¤ ACTOR ;
meahccebivdi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:meahcce#bivdi¤ ACTOR ;
doarjjavuostáváldi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:doarjja#vuostá#váldi¤ ACTOR ;
duodjebacheloroahppi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:duodje#bachelor#oahppi¤ ACTOR ;
duođaláhki:duođa#láh'ki LAHKI ;
riikkačiekči+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:riikka#čiek'či¤ ACTOR ;
dáhpa:dáhpa DAHPPA ;
dáhppa:dáhppa DAHPPA ;
dákse:dáks TAXI ;
dállooasti+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:dállo#oasti¤ ACTOR ;
máilmmicupvuoiti+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:má#ilmmi#cup9#vuojti¤ ACTOR ;
eallinláhki:eallin#láh'ki LAHKI ;
ealáhusláhki:ealáhus#láh'ki LAHKI ;
eanadoalli+v1+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:eana#doalli¤ ACTOR ;
erenoamášráđđeaddi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum+v1+Use/NG:erenoamáš#ráđđe#addi¤ ACTOR ;
fierbmebivdi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:fierbme#bivdi¤ ACTOR ;
friddjaealli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani:friddja#ealli¤ ACTOR ;
moalabáhčči+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:moala#báhčči¤ ACTOR ;
giddagasbargi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:giddagas#bargi¤ ACTOR ;
gilvovuoddji+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:gilvo#vuoddji¤ ACTOR ;
goavdi:goav'di BEARRI ;
goddinbáikkidutki+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:goddin#báikki#dutki¤ ACTOR ;
guolledutki+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:guolle#dutki¤ ACTOR ;
guovda+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc+CmpN/Last:guov'da BEARRI ;
gádjunbargi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:gádjun#bargi¤ ACTOR ;
historjjádutki+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:historjjá#dutki¤ ACTOR ;
suolaoapmi:suola#oapmi BEARRI ;
iešbirgenláhki:ieš#birgen#láh'ki LAHKI ;
iešláhki:ieš#láh'ki LAHKI ;
juhkki+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Hum:juhkki¤ ACTOR ;
juogaláhki+Use/LexSub:juoga#láh'ki LAHKI ;
kulttorčálli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:kulttor#čálli¤ ACTOR ;
kárra:kárra BEARRI ;
liehkku:liehkku BEARRI ;
liehku:lieh'ku BEARRI ;
lobbybargi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:lobby#bargi¤ ACTOR ;
luondduláhki:luonddu#láh'ki LAHKI ;
mediaráđđeaddi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:media#ráđđe#addi¤ ACTOR ;
láhki:láh'ki LAHKI ;
lávdebargi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:lávde#bargi¤ ACTOR ;
meaddelmanni+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:meaddel#manni¤ ACTOR ;
miellaláhki:miella#láh'ki LAHKI ;
mierkávuoidi:mierká#vuojdi¤ ACTOR ;  
mánáidgárdebargi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Use/Sub:mánáid9#gárddi#bargi¤ ACTOR ;
oahpaheaddjeoahppi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:oahpaheaddje#oahppi¤ ACTOR ;
oapmi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani:oapmi BEARRI ;
ovdalisčuožžu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:ovdalis#čuožžu¤ ACTOR ;
korrekturlohkki+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:korrektur#lohkki¤ ACTOR ;
salla:salla BEARRI ;
skutervuoddji+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:skuter#vuoddji¤ ACTOR ;
sykkelvuoddji+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:sykkel#vuoddji¤ ACTOR ;
tákse+Veh:táks TAXI ;
vearrogeassi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:vearro#geassi¤ ACTOR ;
váldohárjehalli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:váldo#hárjehalli¤ ACTOR ;
muorrasalla:muorra#salla BEARRI ;
luonddudutki+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:luonddu#dutki¤ ACTOR ;
láhkaolmmáičálli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:láhka#olmmái#čálli¤ ACTOR ;
